Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6148YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2284 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 476.53B Wind turbine inspections. 1 1. The purpose of this section is to establish routine 2 inspection requirements for wind turbines in Iowa to ensure the 3 safety, efficiency, and compliance with state standards. These 4 measures aim to prevent accidents, protect public safety, and 5 promote responsible renewable energy generation in the state. 6 2. As used in this section: 7 a. âInspectionâ means a systematic process of evaluating 8 the condition of a wind turbine, including its structural, 9 mechanical, and electrical components. 10 b. âQualified inspectorâ means a professional who meets 11 training, experience, and examination standards in the field of 12 wind turbine inspection and maintenance. 13 c. âWind turbineâ means a mechanical device that converts 14 the kinetic energy from wind into electricity and has a 15 nameplate generating capacity greater than one hundred 16 kilowatts. 17 3. a. All wind turbines in Iowa shall be inspected by a 18 qualified inspector at least once every twelve months. The 19 inspection must include a detailed assessment of the wind 20 turbineâs structural, mechanical, electrical, and safety 21 systems, including all the following: 22 (1) Blade condition and wear. 23 (2) Tower integrity. 24 (3) Gearbox and electrical components. 25 (4) Safety features, including brakes and emergency 26 shut-off systems. 27 (5) Maintenance history. 28 b. In the event of any significant operational anomaly, 29 safety concern, or after extreme weather events, including 30 lightning, an additional inspection shall be conducted within 31 seventy-two hours of the event by a qualified inspector. 32 c. Within thirty days of each inspection required under 33 paragraph âaâ or âbâ , the wind turbine operator must submit a 34 wind turbine inspection report to the commission. The report 35 -1- LSB 6148YH (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 4 H.F. 2284 must include all of the following: 1 (1) Findings of the inspection, including any deficiencies 2 or necessary repairs. 3 (2) Documentation of any corrective actions taken or plans 4 to address deficiencies. 5 (3) Certification of compliance with applicable state and 6 federal safety standards. 7 d. If any safety concerns are identified during the 8 inspection, the wind turbine operator must halt operation of 9 the wind turbine and correct any issues within ninety days 10 after the submission of the inspection report. If correction 11 of the issues requires more than ninety days, the operator must 12 submit a detailed timeline and plan for the resolution of the 13 issues to the commission. 14 4. a. A wind turbine operator who fails to conduct an 15 inspection required under subsection 3 shall be subject to a 16 civil penalty of no more than five thousand dollars per turbine 17 per inspection period. 18 b. A wind turbine operator who fails to submit an inspection 19 report to the commission within thirty days of an inspection, 20 as required under subsection 3, paragraph âcâ , shall be subject 21 to a civil penalty of no more than two thousand dollars. 22 c. A wind turbine operator in violation of subsection 3, 23 paragraph âdâ , is subject to a civil penalty of up to ten 24 thousand dollars per turbine. 25 d. A wind turbine operator who repeatedly fails to comply 26 with the inspection and maintenance requirements under 27 subsection 3 is subject to increased penalties or suspension of 28 operation of any noncompliant wind turbines at the discretion 29 of the commission. 30 5. a. The commission shall be responsible for the 31 administration and enforcement of this section, including 32 the inspection frequency, compliance reporting, and penalty 33 assessments. 34 b. The commission may conduct random audits of wind turbine 35 -2- LSB 6148YH (3) 91 sb/js 2/ 4 H.F. 2284 inspections and reports to verify compliance. 1 c. The commission shall maintain a public database of wind 2 turbine inspections, including inspection dates, findings, 3 corrective actions, and compliance status. 4 6. This section applies to all wind turbine operators 5 and wind energy conversion facilities, as defined in section 6 476C.1, within the state of Iowa. 7